Utah statutes.
16-16-119.   Resignation of agent for service of process.

(1)  To resign as an agent for service of process of a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative, the agent shall deliver to the division for filing a statement of resignation containing the name of the agent and the name of the association or foreign cooperative.

(2)  After receiving a statement of resignation under Subsection (1), the division shall file it and mail or otherwise provide or deliver a copy to the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative at its principal office.

(3)  An agency for service of process of a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative terminates on the earlier of:

(a)  the 31st day after the division files a statement of resignation under Subsection (2); or

(b)  when a record designating a new agent for service of process is delivered to the division for filing on behalf of the association or foreign cooperative and becomes effective.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

